apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON MES
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Acc:mese%>m       FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:mese%>n       FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:mese%>se      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:mese%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:mese%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Com:mes%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mes%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Acc:%>mes%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mes%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>mes%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>mes%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>mes%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Com:%>mes%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl:mes            EVEN_ESS ;
+A+Superl+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP    R ;
+A+Superl+SgGenCmp:mese%>n R ;
+A+Superl+PlGenCmp:mes%>i  R ;

LEXICON MES_oe
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Acc:mese%>m       FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:mese%>n       FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:mese%>se      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:mese%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:mese%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Com:mes%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mes%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2%>mes%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Acc:%>mes%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mes%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2%>mes%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>mes%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>mes%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>mes%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Com:%>mes%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl:mes            EVEN_ESS ;
+A+Superl+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP    R ;
+A+Superl+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP    R ;
+A+Superl+SgGenCmp:mese%>n R ;
+A+Superl+PlGenCmp:mes%>i  R ;

LEXICON OMMES
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+A+Superl+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
+A+Superl:      N_ODD_ESS ;
+A+Superl+SgNomCmp:            R ;
+A+Superl+SgGenCmp:e%>n        R ;
+A+Superl+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;


! ===========================
! Verbal inflection sublexica
! ===========================


! The auxiliaries
! ===============

LEXICON LEA

!+Inf:lea	  FINAL1 ; ! Uses årrodh
+Ind+Prs:l    LEA-PRES	;
+Ind+Prt:l    LEA-PRET	;
+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:l    LEA-PRET	;
+Imprt:l		  LEA-IMP ;
+ConNeg:leah  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON LEA-PRES
+Sg1:eam    FINAL1	;
+Sg2:eah    FINAL1	;
+Sg3:ea     FINAL1	;
+Du1:ean    FINAL1	;
+Du2:idien  FINAL1	;
+Du3:ægan   FINAL1	;
+Pl1:ibie   FINAL1	;
+Pl2:idie   FINAL1	;
+Pl3:eah    FINAL1	;

LEXICON LEA-PRET
+Sg1:im     FINAL1	;
+Sg2:ih     FINAL1	;
+Sg3:ij     FINAL1	;
+Du1:imen   FINAL1	;
+Du2:iden   FINAL1	;
+Du3:igan   FINAL1	;
+Pl1:imh    FINAL1	;
+Pl2:idh    FINAL1	;
+Pl3:in     FINAL1	;

LEXICON LEA-IMP
+Sg2:eah    FINAL1 ;
+Du2:idien  FINAL1 ;
+Pl2:idie   FINAL1 ;


! The negative verb
! =================

LEXICON NEG
+Ind+Prs:      IJ-PRES ;
+Ind+Prt:idtj  VSUF-PRT ;
+Imprt:aell      NEGIMP ;
+Imprt:oll       OLLE ;
+Ind+Prt:  IJ-COPULA ;



!Negation "var ikke" -  is not in, but we have here three kind of negationsystems
!AJ= Anna Jacobsen
!KB= Knut Bergsland 


!SG
!         -AJ-      KB         -Røros
!1.sg: im lih  - im lim      - eedtjem lih (merknader s.45 i Bergsland)
!2.sg: ih lih - ih lih       - eedtjh lih (merknader s.45 i Bergsland)
!3.sg: ij lij - ij lih       - eedtji lih (merknader s.45 i Bergsland)

!Dual
!          - AJ         - KB- 
!1.dual: ij limen - ean limen
!2.dual: ij liden - idien liden
!3.dual: ij ligan - eakan ligan

! Plural
!        -AJ     -  KB -          
!1.pl:  ij limh  - ibie limh      (merknader s.45 på også ij limh i Bergsland) 
!2.pl:  ij lidh  - idie lidh
!3.pl:  ij lin   - eah lin 

! And her are some eks. 
!ij lim(b) manne gåetesne dellie - this one is like KB's 1.p.sg.
!datne ih lih gåetesne gænnah
!Piere ij lih gåetesne
!
!ij limen månnoeh gåetesne gænnah
!ij liden dåtnoeh gåetesne
!Dah guaktah ij lin/ligan gåetesne gænnah
!
!Ij limh mijjieh gåetesne gænnah
!Dijjieh ij lidh gåetesne gænnah
!Dah ij lin gåetesne gænnah


LEXICON OLLE
+Sg1:em     FINAL1 ;
+Sg2:h      FINAL1 ;
+Sg3:es     FINAL1 ;
+Du1:en     FINAL1 ;
!+Du2:ijidien    FINAL1 ;
+Du2:eden   FINAL1 ;
+Du3:es     FINAL1 ;
+Pl1:ebe    FINAL1 ;
!+Pl1:ijibie    FINAL1 ;
!+Pl2:ijidie    FINAL1 ;
+Pl2:ede    FINAL1 ;
+Pl3:es     FINAL1 ;


LEXICON NEGIMP
+Sg1:iem    FINAL1 ;
+Sg2:ieh    FINAL1 ;
+Sg3:ies    FINAL1 ;
+Du1:ien   FINAL1 ;
+Du2:eden   FINAL1 ;
!+Du2:iejidien   FINAL1 ;
+Du3:ies    FINAL1 ;
+Pl1:ebe    FINAL1 ;
+Pl2:ede    FINAL1 ;
!+Pl2:iejidie    FINAL1 ;
+Pl3:ies    FINAL1 ;

LEXICON IJ-PRES
+Sg1:im     FINAL1	;
+Sg2:ih     FINAL1	;
+Sg3:ij     FINAL1	;

+Du1:ean    FINAL1	;
+Du2:idien  FINAL1	;
+Du3:eakan  FINAL1	;
+Pl1:ibie   FINAL1	;
+Pl2:idie   FINAL1	;
+Pl3:eah    FINAL1	;

LEXICON IJ-COPULA
+Sg1:im     FINAL1	;
+Sg2:ih     FINAL1	;
+Sg3:ij     FINAL1	;
+Du1:ij  FINAL1	;
+Du2:ij  FINAL1	;
+Du3:ij  FINAL1	;
+Pl1:ij  FINAL1	;
+Pl2:ij  FINAL1	;
+Pl3:ij  FINAL1	;



LEXICON EDTJEDH
+Ind+Prs:       ED-PRES ;
+Ind+Prt:       ED-PRET ;
+Imprt:           ED-IMP  ;
+Inf:edh        FINAL1	;
+VGen:eminie    FINAL1	;
+Act:eme        FINAL1	;
+ConNeg:h       FINAL1	;
+PrfPrc:eme     FINAL1  ;

LEXICON ED-PRES
+Sg1:em         FINAL1	;
+Sg2:h          FINAL1	;
+Sg3:a          FINAL1	;
+Du1:ien        FINAL1	;
+Du2:eden       FINAL1	;
+Du2:ijidien       FINAL1	;
+Du3:ijægan     FINAL1	;
+Pl1:ebe        FINAL1	;
+Pl1:ijibie        FINAL1	;
+Pl2:ijidie        FINAL1	;
+Pl2:ede        FINAL1	;
+Pl3:ieh        FINAL1	;

LEXICON ED-PRET
+Sg1:im     FINAL1	;
+Sg2:ih     FINAL1	;
+Sg3:i      FINAL1	;
+Du1:imen   FINAL1	;
+Du2:iden   FINAL1	;
+Du3:igan   FINAL1	;
+Pl1:imh    FINAL1	;
+Pl2:idh    FINAL1	;
+Pl3:in     FINAL1	;

LEXICON ED-IMP
 +Sg2:h      FINAL1  ;
 +Du2:eden   FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:ede    FINAL1  ;




! Odd-syllable verbs
! ==================

! Odd syllable verbs differ in Prt Sg3.
! This form is treated separately, and
! the rest of the paradigm is conflated.

! According to Errata för Verbh this is not the case.
! Thus, the form in -e is wrong, and we wil replace DÅERIEDIDH 
! WITH GOLTELIDH.

!LEXICON DÅERIEDIDH ! This one is commented out now that GOLTELIDH works
! GOLTELIDH ;       ! Next step is to remove it.

!LEXICON GOLTELIDH ! one Verbh class
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i FINAL1 ;
!              :%>  V-ODD ;

!LEXICON DÅERIEDIDH ! The other 4 Verbh classes
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i FINAL1 ;
!              :%>  V-ODD ;


!LEXICON V-ODD

LEXICON GOLTELIDH !odd-syll with -adte- as Der2
 COMMON-ODD ;
+V+Der2+Der/adte:%»%^adteUMLadt GOEGKERDADTEDH ;

!LEXICON AERVIEDIDH !odd-syll with -adte- as Der2 and eds-derivation
! COMMON-ODD ;
!+V+Der2+Der/adte:%»%^adteUMLadt GOEGKERDADTEDH ;
!+V+Der2+Der/eds:%^DISIMPs NULL-NULL-ODD-1 ;


LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH  !for stems ending -t-: dåajvoeht-, odd-syll with -alle- as Der2
 COMMON-ODD ;
+V+Der2+Der/alle:%»%^adteUMLall GOEGKERDADTEDH ;

LEXICON Verb
ij+V+Neg: NEG ;
lea+V: LEA ;
edtjedh+V:edtj EDTJEDH ;
aejliestidh:aejliest DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
baahkedidh:baahked GOLTELIDH "värma upp" ;
baataridh:baatar GOLTELIDH ;
badtjadidh:badtjad GOLTELIDH ;
bearkadidh:bearkad GOLTELIDH ;
boelehtjidh:boelehtj GOLTELIDH "bränna sig" ;
boerhkenidh:boerhken GOLTELIDH "slitas av, gå av" ;
båårhkesjidh:båårhkesj GOLTELIDH "barka:garva (skinn och läder)" ;
bïepmehtidh:bïepmeht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "mata" ;
bïerkenidh:bïerken GOLTELIDH "bärga sig, klara sig" ;
bïssedidh:bïssed GOLTELIDH "tvätta sig" ;
dåajvoehtidh:dåajvoeht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "lova (någon något, att göra något)" ;
fååtesidh:fååtes GOLTELIDH "sakna, saknas, fattas" ;
gaarehtidh:gaareht DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
gabpeldidh:gabpeld GOLTELIDH ;
gadsehtidh:gadseht DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
geervehtidh:geerveht DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
goltelidh:goltel GOLTELIDH "lyssna" ;
guepmierdidh:guepmierd GOLTELIDH ;
gïehtjedidh:gïehtjed GOLTELIDH "se över, se grundligt efter, undersöka (om alla renar er där, om främmande renar kommit in i hjorden)" ;
haampeldidh:haampeld GOLTELIDH "ro åt samma håll som man har ansiktet" ;
haeliehtidh:haelieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "flyga" ;
heannadidh:heannad GOLTELIDH "ske inträffa" ;
håhkesjidh:håhkesj GOLTELIDH ;
jaavoelidh:jaavoel GOLTELIDH "försvinna" ;
joekedidh:joeked GOLTELIDH "dela ut (till flera)" ;
loedtenidh:loedten GOLTELIDH "rämna, spricka" ;
luhpiedidh:luhpied GOLTELIDH ;
mieriedidh:mieried GOLTELIDH "foreskrive, forordne" ;
moenedidh:moened GOLTELIDH "gissa" ;
mohtedidh:mohted GOLTELIDH ;
mujjehtidh:mujjeht DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
nehkiehtidh:nehkieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "puffa, skjuta (fram, på, ut), (hollå på att) skjuta på" ;
njabpedidh:njabped GOLTELIDH ;
njorkedidh:njorked GOLTELIDH ;
njovhkedidh:njovhked GOLTELIDH ;
noeledidh:noeled GOLTELIDH "klä av sej" ;
orrestidh:orrest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "förnya, upprepa" ;
raejkiedidh:raejkied GOLTELIDH "göra hål i ngt" ;
rahkestidh:rahkest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "hyvla" ;
reakadidh:reakad GOLTELIDH "bli född, födas" ;
ryöjnesjidh:ryöjnesj GOLTELIDH "valla" ;
saangerdidh:saangerd GOLTELIDH ;
saemiestidh:saemiest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "tala samiska" ;
seavahtidh:seavaht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "vinka, göra tecken (med handen)" ;
sigkestidh:sigkest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "dra, rycka en gång" ;
sjuehkiehtidh:sjuehkieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "sucka en gång" ;
sjugniedidh:sjugnied GOLTELIDH "skapa" ;
snihkiestidh:snihkiest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "gråta, snörvla" ;
snåhkaridh:snåhkar GOLTELIDH "snubbla, falla framåt" ;
soptsestidh:soptsest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "berätta/tala med ngn" ;
sualadidh:sualad GOLTELIDH "stjäla" ;
suejielidh:suejiel GOLTELIDH ;
sïllestidh:sïllest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "kliva över" ;
tjahkasjidh:tjahkasj GOLTELIDH "sitta" ;
tjietskesjidh:tjietskesj GOLTELIDH ;
tjuedtjielidh:tjuedtjiel GOLTELIDH ;
tjuvliestidh:tjuvliest DÅAJVOEHTIDH "kyssa" ;
tjïrrehtidh:tjïrreht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "bötlägga" ;
unniedidh:unnied GOLTELIDH ;
ussjedidh:ussjed GOLTELIDH "tänka" ;
uvtedidh:uvted GOLTELIDH ;
vaestiedidh:vaestied GOLTELIDH "svara" ;
veeledidh:veeled GOLTELIDH "luta sig" ;
viehkiehtidh:viehkieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH "hjälpa" ;
ånnadidh:ånnad GOLTELIDH "unna sig" ;
buerie#sjugniedidh:buerie#sjugnied GOLTELIDH "velsigne" ;
LEXICON Adjective
gamte:gemtie MES ; ! e(1)-stamme
löövles:löövle MES ; ! e(3)-stamme
noere:nööre MES ; ! e(1)-stamme
orre:urre MES ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
plaave:plaave MES ; ! e(1)-stamme
rööpses:rööpse MES ; ! e(3)-stamme
